Tennessee statutes. Title 38 Prevention And Detection Of Crime
Part 5

Racial Profiling Prevention Act

38-1-501. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Racial Profiling Prevention Act.”

Acts 2015, ch. 335, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Former part 5, §§ 38-1-501 — 38-1-503 (Acts 2008, ch. 977, §§ 1, 2), concerning the Racial Profiling Prevention Act, was deleted as obsolete by the code commission in 2010.

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 335, § 2. May 4, 2015.

38-1-502. Part definitions.

As used in this part:

“Law enforcement agency”:

Means a lawfully established state or local public agency that:

Is responsible for preventing and detecting crime and enforcing laws or local ordinances; and

Has employees who are authorized to make arrests for crimes while acting within the scope of their authority; and

Includes an institution considered a “law enforcement agency” pursuant to § 49-7-118; and

“Racial profiling” means the detention or interdiction of an individual in traffic contacts, field contacts, or asset seizure and forfeiture efforts solely on the basis of the individual's actual or perceived race, color, ethnicity, or national origin.

Acts 2015, ch. 335, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Former part 5, §§ 38-1-501 — 38-1-503 (Acts 2008, ch. 977, §§ 1, 2), concerning the Racial Profiling Prevention Act, was deleted as obsolete by the code commission in 2010.

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 335, § 2. May 4, 2015.

38-1-503. Adoption of written policy prohibiting racial profiling.

Each law enforcement agency shall adopt a written policy that prohibits racial profiling by its employees. Each agency shall adopt its written policy on or before January 1, 2016.

Acts 2015, ch. 335, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Former part 5, §§ 38-1-501 — 38-1-503 (Acts 2008, ch. 977, §§ 1, 2), concerning the Racial Profiling Prevention Act, was deleted as obsolete by the code commission in 2010.

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 335, § 2. May 4, 2015.